Utah statutes.
20A-9-203.   Declarations of candidacy -- Municipal general elections.
(1) (a) (i)  A person may become a candidate for any municipal office if:
(A)  the person is a registered voter; and
(B) (I)  the person has resided within the municipality in which that person
seeks to hold elective office for the 12 consecutive months immediately before
the date of the election; or
(II)  if the territory in which the person resides was annexed into the
municipality, the person has resided within the annexed territory or the
municipality the 12 consecutive months immediately before the date of the
election.
(ii)  For purposes of determining whether a person meets the residency
requirement of Subsection (1)(a)(i)(B)(I) in a municipality that was
incorporated less than 12 months before the election, the municipality shall
be considered to have been incorporated 12 months before the date of the
election.
(b)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), each candidate for
a municipal council position shall, if elected from a district, be a resident
of the council district from which elected.
(c)  In accordance with Utah Constitution Article IV, Section 6, any mentally
incompetent person, any person convicted of a felony, or any person convicted
of treason or a crime against the elective franchise may not hold office in
this state until the right to hold elective office is restored under Section
20A-2-101.5.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b) or (2)(c), each person
seeking to become a candidate for a municipal office shall:
(i)  file a declaration of candidacy, in person with the city recorder or town
clerk, during office hours and not later than the close of normal office
hours, between July 1 and July 15 of any odd numbered year; and
(ii)  pay the filing fee, if one is required by municipal ordinance.
(b) (i)  As used in this Subsection (2)(b), "registered voters" means the
number of persons registered to vote in the municipality on the January 1 of
the municipal election year.
(ii)  A third, fourth, or fifth class city that used the convention system to
nominate candidates in the last municipal election as authorized by Subsection
20A-9-404(3) or used the process contained in this Subsection (2)(b) in the
last municipal election or a town that used the convention system to nominate
candidates in the last municipal election as authorized by Subsection
20A-9-404(3) or used the process contained in this Subsection (2)(b) in the
last municipal election may, by ordinance, require, in lieu of the convention
system, that candidates for municipal office file a nominating petition signed
by a percentage of registered voters at the same time that the candidate files
a declaration of candidacy.
(iii)  The ordinance shall specify the number of signatures that the candidate
must obtain on the nominating petition in order to become a candidate for
municipal office under this Subsection (2), but that number may not exceed 5%
of registered voters.
(c)  Any resident of a municipality may nominate a candidate for a municipal
office by:
(i)  filing a nomination petition with the city recorder or town clerk during
office hours, but not later than the close of normal office hours, between
July 1 and July 15 of any odd-numbered year; and
(ii)  paying the filing fee, if one is required by municipal ordinance.
(3) (a)  Before the filing officer may accept any declaration of candidacy or
nomination petition, the filing officer shall:
(i)  read to the prospective candidate or person filing the petition the
constitutional and statutory qualification requirements for the office that
the candidate is seeking; and
(ii)  require the candidate or person filing the petition to state whether or
not the candidate meets those requirements.
(b)  If the prospective candidate does not meet the qualification requirements
for the office, the filing officer may not accept the declaration of candidacy
or nomination petition.
(c)  If it appears that the prospective candidate meets the requirements of
candidacy, the filing officer shall:
(i)  inform the candidate that the candidate's name will appear on the ballot
as it is written on the declaration of candidacy;
(ii)  provide the candidate with a copy of the current campaign financial
disclosure laws for the office the candidate is seeking and inform the
candidate that failure to comply will result in disqualification as a
candidate and removal of the candidate's name from the ballot;
(iii)  provide the candidate with a copy of Section 20A-7-801 regarding the
Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website Program and inform the
candidate of the submission deadline under Subsection 20A-7-801(4)(a);
(iv)  provide the candidate with a copy of the pledge of fair campaign
practices described under Section 20A-9-206 and inform the candidate that:
(A)  signing the pledge is voluntary; and
(B)  signed pledges shall be filed with the filing officer; and
(v)  accept the declaration of candidacy or nomination petition.
(d)  If the candidate elects to sign the pledge of fair campaign practices,
the filing officer shall:
(i)  accept the candidate's pledge; and
(ii)  if the candidate has filed for a partisan office, provide a certified
copy of the candidate's pledge to the chair of the county or state political
party of which the candidate is a member.
(4)  The declaration of candidacy shall substantially comply with the
following form:
"I, (print name) ____, being first sworn, say that I reside at ____ Street,
City of ____, County of ____, state of Utah, Zip Code ____, Telephone Number
(if any) ____; that I am a registered voter; and that I am a candidate for the
office of ____ (stating the term).  I will meet the legal qualifications
required of candidates for this office.  I will file all campaign financial
disclosure reports as required by law and I understand that failure to do so
will result in my disqualification as a candidate for this office and removal
of my name from the ballot.  I request that my name be printed upon the
applicable official ballots.  (Signed) _______________
Subscribed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me by ____ on this
__________(month\day\year).
(Signed) _______________ (Clerk or other officer qualified to administer
oath)"
(5) (a)  In all first and second class cities, and in third, fourth, or fifth
class cities that have not passed the ordinance authorized by Subsection
(2)(b) and in towns that have not passed the ordinance authorized by
Subsection (2)(b), any registered voter may be nominated for municipal office
by submitting a petition signed by:
(i)  25 residents of the municipality who are at least 18 years old; or
(ii)  20% of the residents of the municipality who are at least 18 years old.
(b) (i)  The petition shall substantially conform to the following form:
"NOMINATION PETITION
The undersigned residents of (name of municipality) being 18 years old or
older nominate (name of nominee) to the office of ____ for the (two or four-
year term, whichever is applicable)."
(ii)  The remainder of the petition shall contain lines and columns for the
signatures of persons signing the petition and their addresses and telephone
numbers.
(6) (a)  In third, fourth, and fifth class cities that have passed the
ordinance authorized by Subsection (2)(b), and in towns that have passed the
ordinance authorized by Subsection (2)(b), any registered voter may be
nominated for municipal office by submitting a petition signed by the same
percentage of registered voters in the municipality as required by the
ordinance passed under authority of Subsection (2)(b).
(b) (i)  The petition shall substantially conform to the following form:
"NOMINATION PETITION
The undersigned residents of (name of municipality) being 18 years old or
older nominate (name of nominee) to the office of (name of office) for the
(two or four-year term, whichever is applicable)."
(ii)  The remainder of the petition shall contain lines and columns for the
signatures of persons signing the petition and their addresses and telephone
numbers.
(7)  If the declaration of candidacy or nomination petition fails to state
whether the nomination is for the two or four-year term, the clerk shall
consider the nomination to be for the four-year term.
(8) (a)  The clerk shall verify with the county clerk that all candidates are
registered voters.
(b)  Any candidate who is not registered to vote is disqualified and the clerk
may not print the candidate's name on the ballot.
(9)  Immediately after expiration of the period for filing a declaration of
candidacy, the clerk shall:
(a)  cause the names of the candidates as they will appear on the ballot to be
published:
(i)  in at least two successive publications of a newspaper with general
circulation in the municipality; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101; and
(b)  notify the lieutenant governor of the names of the candidates as they
will appear on the ballot.
(10)  A declaration of candidacy or nomination petition filed under this
section may not be amended after the expiration of the period for filing a
declaration of candidacy.
(11) (a)  A declaration of candidacy or nomination petition filed under this
section is valid unless a written objection is filed with the clerk within
five days after the last day for filing.
(b)  If an objection is made, the clerk shall:
(i)  mail or personally deliver notice of the objection to the affected
candidate immediately; and
(ii)  decide any objection within 48 hours after it is filed.
(c)  If the clerk sustains the objection, the candidate may correct the
problem by amending the declaration or petition within three days after the
objection is sustained or by filing a new declaration within three days after
the objection is sustained.
(d) (i)  The clerk's decision upon objections to form is final.
(ii)  The clerk's decision upon substantive matters is reviewable by a
district court if prompt application is made to the district court.
(iii)  The decision of the district court is final unless the Supreme Court,
in the exercise of its discretion, agrees to review the lower court decision.
(12)  Any person who filed a declaration of candidacy and was nominated, and
any person who was nominated by a nomination petition, may, any time up to 23
days before the election, withdraw the nomination by filing a written
affidavit with the clerk.
